Nebraska, session 109, LB839.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB839 LB839
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 19-5504, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
19-5504 (1) On or before July 1, 2021, and by each July 1 every two
years thereafter, each city shall electronically submit a report to the
Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature detailing its efforts to
address the availability of and incentives for affordable housing through
its zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations. Such report shall include,
but not be limited to:
(a) An overview of the city's current residential zoning
requirements;
(b) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city
zoned for residential use which permit the construction of multifamily
housing and middle housing, including whether such areas are zoned
specifically for residential use or generally allow residential use, and
whether such construction is permitted with or without any additional
permit requirements;
(c) A breakdown of new residential construction within the corporate
limits of the city over the previous five years, including the percentage
of such construction that was single-family housing, multifamily housing,
and middle housing;
(d) A breakdown of residential units annexed by the city over the
previous five years, including the percentage of such units that were
single-family housing, multifamily housing, and middle housing;
(e) An estimate of the per-unit cost of housing within the corporate
limits of the city;
(f) Whether such zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations provide
for density bonuses or other concessions or incentives which encourage
residential density, and the frequency with which such bonuses,
concessions, or incentives are utilized;
(g) Whether such zoning codes, ordinances, and regulations allow the
construction of accessory dwelling units, what efforts have been made by
-2-

LB839 LB839
2026 2026
the city to expand the use of accessory dwelling units, what obstacles
exist to allowing more accessory dwelling units in the city and any
strategies to overcome those obstacles, and which areas of the city allow
for accessory dwelling units by right;
(h) What incentives the city applies to encourage the development of
affordable housing, including both direct incentives and regulatory
relief;
(i) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city
zoned for residential use which have been declared substandard and
blighted areas under the Community Development Law;
(j) The percentage of areas within the corporate limits of the city
zoned for residential use which have been declared extremely blighted
areas under the Community Development Law;
(k) A demographic analysis of the city with trends and estimates of
the housing need classified by housing type and price range; and
(l)(i) The number of multifamily housing units constructed within
the corporate limits of the city and issued an initial certificate of
occupancy since January 1, 2021, and either:
(A) The number of such units considered covered multifamily
dwellings that were designed and constructed in accordance with the
accessibility requirements of the federal Fair Housing Act, 42 U.S.C.
3601 et seq. For purposes of this subdivision, covered multifamily
dwelling has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 3604; or
(B) The number of such units considered Type B units under chapter
11 of the 2018 edition of the International Building Code.
(ii) If a city is unable to provide the information described in
subdivision (l)(i) of this subsection with regard to construction that
occurred on or after January 1, 2021, and before the effective date of
this act, the city shall note such fact in its report and may omit such
information from the report;
(m) (l) Efforts to adopt an affordable housing action plan as
-3-

LB839 LB839
2026 2026
required under section 19-5505 or efforts to implement an affordable
housing action plan after such plan is adopted; and .
(n) Recommendations on actions that the state could take to assist
cities in the construction of affordable housing.
(2) The Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature may require any
city to present its report to the committee at a public hearing.
Sec. 2. Section 58-701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
58-701 Sections 58-701 to 58-712 and section 3 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Accessible has the same meaning as in 24 C.F.R. 8.3, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2026; and
(b) Multifamily rental unit project means residential buildings that
contain five or more dwelling units within one structure occupied by
renters.
(2) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Department of
Economic Development shall not approve a multifamily rental unit project
for assistance from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund unless:
(a) At least five percent of the dwelling units included in the
project will be accessible for persons with mobility impairments; and
(b) At least two percent of the dwelling units included in the
project will be accessible for persons with hearing or vision
impairments.
Sec. 4. Original section 19-5504, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and section 58-701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
are repealed.
-4-